California statutes. Public Contract Code
(3) Each bidding job order contractor shall agree to identify any subcontractors to be used for the job orders performed pursuant to the job order contract.

(4) The award of job order contracts, if any, shall be made to a job order contractor or to job order contractors that the authority determines to be qualified and responsive based upon preestablished criteria to be determined by the authority.

(5) The job order contractors shall comply with the authority’s project labor agreement, as applicable.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph
 (4), the authority, by a process determined by the authority, may award any job order for repair or renovation work with a value equal to or less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to a job order contractor that is also a certified small business enterprise, as established by the authority’s small business enterprise certification process or any similar certification process acceptable to the authority, or to a job order contractor that is also a disabled veterans business enterprise, as certified by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20386.5.

(a) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a single job order contract shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the initial contract term of the job order contract. No single job order may exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(b) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months and may be extended or renewed for two subsequent annual terms and a maximum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) over the subsequent two terms of the contract.

(c) Work shall not be split or separated into smaller job orders for the purpose of
 evading the cost limitation provisions of this article.

(d) Dollar amounts specified in this section may be adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20387.

(a) All work bid under job order contracts shall comply with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 and is subject to all of the penalties and provisions set forth in that chapter.

(b) For purposes of this article, if a job order contractor chooses to use a subcontractor, the job order contractor shall verify that the subcontractor possesses and maintains the appropriate licenses and credentials required.

(c) If the authority, after conducting an administrative due process review, determines that there has been a violation of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1, including, but
 not limited to, bid shopping by the job order contractor, the authority may terminate the job order contract, declare the contractor ineligible for future job order contracts for a period of time to be determined by the authority, or withdraw authorization for the contractor to proceed with awarded work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20387.3.

(a) A job order contract shall set forth in the general conditions of the job order contract the party or parties responsible for seeing that Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code is complied with.

(b) For purposes of job order contracting, prevailing wages shall apply to all work ordered under the job order contract regardless of thresholds set forth in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code.

(c) The job order contractor shall pay the prevailing wage in effect at the time the job order contract is issued by the authority and all increases as published
 by the Department of Industrial Relations for the term of the job order contract, including all overtime, holiday, and shift provisions published by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(d) The authority shall designate one individual to act as a monitor to inspect job sites for labor compliance violations at the request of the designated labor representative in its project labor agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20387.5.

In order to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse, the authority shall prepare for each individual job order developed under a job order contract an independent cost estimate. The estimate shall be prepared prior to the receipt of any job order contractor’s estimate for the work and shall be compared to the job order contractor’s estimate to determine the reasonableness of that estimate before issuance of any job order. If the authority finds the job order contractor’s estimate to perform work for a given job order to be unreasonable, not cost effective, or undesirable, the authority may elect not to issue the job order to the job order contractor, and may, instead, utilize any other available procurement procedures or choose not to move forward
 with the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20388.

(a) The authority shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2028, a report on the use of job order contracting under this article. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the authority’s system for evaluating job order contract bids for award of job order contracts, including, but not limited to, the criteria used by the authority to determine a qualified and responsive job order contractor.

(2) A description of each job order contract awarded and the contractor
 awarded the contract.

(3) An assessment of the use of job order contracting under this article.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 20389.)
-------------------------------------------

20389.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 24.5, commencing with Section 20385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 25. Boards of Supervisors—County Highways [20390. - 20397.]

20390.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by boards of supervisors for the construction, repair, or maintenance of a county highway, as provided for in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1070) of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20391.

(a) Whenever the board of supervisors finds that the estimated expense of any necessary work upon any county highway exceeds the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the board shall order definite surveys of the proposed work to be made and shall direct the preparation of profiles, cross-sections, plans, and specifications.

(b) The Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles may delegate the duties described in subdivision (a) to the county road commissioner on a project-by-project basis.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and
 as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 21.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 22 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

20391.

(a) Whenever the board of supervisors finds that the estimated expense of any necessary work upon any county highway exceeds the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the board shall order definite surveys of the proposed work to be made and shall direct the preparation of profiles, cross-sections, plans, and specifications. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 22.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20392.

Upon receipt of such profiles, cross sections, plans, and specifications, the board shall publish a notice calling for sealed bids for the performance of the work specified. The notice shall refer to said profiles, cross sections, plans, and specifications, and shall set a time at which bids will be opened. The board shall cause this notice to be published for at least 10 consecutive times, prior to the date set for opening bids, in a daily newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county and designated by the board, or for at least two consecutive times prior to such date in a weekly newspaper printed and published in the county and designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20392.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the county.

(c) A certified check made payable to the county.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the county.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the county beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

20393.

At the time specified in the notice, the board shall publicly open all bids received and shall award the contract for the work to the lowest responsible bidder, unless the board finds that the bids are too high, and that the work can be done more cheaply by day labor. In such case, the board shall reject the bids and order the work to be done by the road commissioners in whose districts the work is situated. In any case, the board may reject all bids and advertise for new bids in the manner specified in this article. The board may provide, by resolution, that the bids be opened, examined, and declared by an officer designated in the resolution. Any such resolution shall require that the bids be opened at a public meeting called by the officer and that the results of the bidding be reported to the board at a subsequent regular board meeting. The notice inviting bids shall state the time and place of the public meeting and the name of the designated officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20394.

Whenever the board finds that the estimated expense of any work to be done upon any county highway is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less, the board or the purchasing agent may let a contract covering both work and material, or purchase the material and let a contract for doing the work, or purchase the materials and do the work by day labor, without calling for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20394.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, whenever the board of supervisors finds that the estimated expense of any work to be done upon any county highway is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, the board or the purchasing agent may have the work done by contract upon notice describing the work in general terms and stating a closing date for submission of bids.

Notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the jurisdiction of the county. Notice shall be published in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code and shall be completed at least 48 hours before the time scheduled for opening of the bids. Notice inviting bids may also be published in a trade publication.

The successful bidder shall give a bond in the amount the board requires, conditioned on the faithful performance of the contract, and on the payment of all labor employed and material used in the work.

The board may delegate its authority under this section to the county road commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20395.

(a) In any county that has appointed a road commissioner pursuant to Section 2006 of the Streets and Highways Code, or in any county that has abolished the office of road commissioner and complied with Section 2006.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, the board of supervisors may authorize the road commissioner, or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county director of transportation, to have any work upon county highways done under their supervision and direction. The work may be done in any of the following ways:

(1) By letting a contract covering both work and material. In that event, the contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder as provided in this article.

(2) By
 purchasing the material and letting a contract for the performance of the work. In that event, the material shall be bought at the lowest possible cost and the contract let to the lowest responsible bidder as provided in this article.

(3) By purchasing the material and having the work done by day labor, in which case advertising for bids is not required.

(4) (A) By authorizing the county road commissioner or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county director of transportation to execute changes or additions to the work for any contract pursuant to this section in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for contracts of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, or 10 percent for contracts over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) but not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any change or
 addition to the work exceed a net total addition of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(B) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the original contract cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), no change or alteration shall exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000).

(b) The County of Los Angeles may elect to be subject to all of the following provisions:

(1) For contracts whose original cost exceeds twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed four hundred
 thousand dollars ($400,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(2) For contracts whose original cost exceeds fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) If the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the decision by the county engineer or other county officer whom authority was delegated to shall be binding on the County of Los Angeles, and all existing protest and grievance procedures regarding that decision remain valid.

(4) At the time
 the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the board shall implement appropriate measures to prevent fraud and ensure accountability for that delegated authority.

(5) This subdivision does not apply if the sum of the contracts modified under this subdivision, subdivision (c) of Section 20142, subdivision (e) of Section 20405, subdivision (b) of Section 20614, and subdivision (b) of Section 20998, exceeds seven contracts.

(6) If a contract is modified under this subdivision, the County of Los Angeles shall provide a review report to the Assembly Committee on Local Government and the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance no later than July 1, 2026.

(c) The County of Santa Clara may elect to be subject to
 all of the following provisions:

(1) For contracts whose original cost exceeds twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(2) For contracts whose original cost exceeds fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) If the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the decision by the county
 engineer or other county officer whom authority was delegated to shall be binding on the County of Santa Clara, and all existing protest and grievance procedures regarding that decision remain valid.

(4) At the time the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the board shall implement appropriate measures to prevent fraud and ensure accountability for that delegated authority.

(5) This subdivision does not apply if the sum of the contracts modified under this subdivision and subdivision (d) of Section 20142 exceeds seven contracts.

(6) If a contract is modified under this subdivision, the County of Santa Clara shall provide a review report to the Assembly Committee on Local Government and the Senate Committee
 on Governance and Finance no later than July 1, 2026.

(d) By purchasing the material and letting a contract for the work or by letting a contract covering both work and material without advertising for bids when the estimated cost of emergency work necessitated by the imminence or occurrence of a landslide, flood, storm damage, or other emergency exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and the public interest and necessity demand immediate action to safeguard life, health, or property.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 281, Sec. 2.   (AB 1649)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20395.

In any county that has appointed a road commissioner pursuant to Section 2006 of the Streets and Highways Code, or in any county that has abolished the office of road commissioner and complied with Section 2006.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, the board of supervisors may authorize the road commissioner, or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county director of transportation, to have any work upon county highways done under their supervision and direction. The work may be done in any of the following ways:

(a) By letting a contract covering both work and material. In that event, the contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder as provided in this article.

(b) By purchasing the material and letting a contract for the performance of the work. In that event, the material shall be bought at the lowest possible cost and the contract let to the lowest responsible bidder as provided in this article.

(c) By purchasing the material and having the work done by day labor, in which case advertising for bids is not required.

(d) (1) By authorizing the county road commissioner or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county director of transportation to execute changes or additions to the work for any contract pursuant to this section in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for contracts of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less,
 or 10 percent for contracts over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) but not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any change or addition to the work exceed a net total addition of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the original contract cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any change or alteration exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars
 ($210,000).

(e) By purchasing the material and letting a contract for the work or by letting a contract covering both work and material without advertising for bids when the estimated cost of emergency work necessitated by the imminence or occurrence of a landslide, flood, storm damage, or other emergency exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and the public interest and necessity demand immediate action to safeguard life, health, or property.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 4.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20396.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any county employing a competent engineer as road commissioner, the board of supervisors may elect to perform work or projects or let contracts for the performance of work or projects under the provisions of the State Contract Act pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code; and when such election is made, references in said act to state shall mean county, and references to any state agency shall mean county board of supervisors, or such county agency as the board of supervisors may designate, and the provisions of said act shall be fully applicable to work or projects so to be performed by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20397.

In counties containing a population of two million or over and employing a registered engineer as road commissioner, the board of supervisors may authorize the moving, relocation, or reestablishment of detention camps by force account or day labor where such camps are used in connection with county highway construction or maintenance work, if the board determines that such work of moving, relocation, or reestablishment can be done more economically and satisfactorily by force account or day labor than by contract, and that the total estimated cost of new or additional building structural materials necessary to be purchased in order to perform such work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 26. Boards of Supervisors—County Bridges or Subways [20400. - 20409.]

20400.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by boards of supervisors for the construction, maintenance and repair of a county bridge or subway, as provided for in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20402.

Except as provided in Sections 20406 to 20408, inclusive, whenever the cost of construction or repair of any bridge will exceed the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), such construction or repair shall be done by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20403.

Whenever the board of supervisors finds that the estimated expense of any work to be done on any county bridge is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less, the board or the purchasing agent may let a contract covering both work and material, or purchase the materials and let a contract for doing the work, without calling for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20404.

(a) The board of supervisors shall adopt plans, specifications, and working details for such construction or repair and shall cause a notice, calling for bids therefor, to be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county. Such notice shall be published for at least 10 consecutive times in a daily newspaper of general circulation published in the county or for at least 2 consecutive times in a weekly newspaper published in the county. If there is no newspaper published in the county, such notice shall be given by posting in three public places in the county for at least two weeks.

(b) The Board of Supervisors of the County
 of Los Angeles may delegate the duties described in subdivision (a) to the county road commissioner on a project-by-project basis.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 23.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 24 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

20404.

(a) The board of supervisors shall adopt plans, specifications, and working details for such construction or repair and shall cause a notice, calling for bids therefor, to be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county. Such notice shall be published for at least 10 consecutive times in a daily newspaper of general circulation published in the county or for at least 2 consecutive times in a weekly newspaper published in the county. If there is no newspaper published in the county, such notice shall be given by posting in three public places in the county for at least two weeks. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 371, Sec. 24.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20405.

(a) The board shall afford all bidders an opportunity to examine the plans, specifications, and working details, and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder. The board may provide by resolution that the bids be opened, examined, and declared by an officer designated in the resolution. The resolution shall require that the bids be opened at a public meeting called by the officer and that the results of the bidding be reported to the board at a subsequent regular board meeting. The notice inviting bids shall state the time and place of the public meeting and the name of the designated officer.

(b) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover
 and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the county.

(3) A certified check made payable to the county.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the county.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the county beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(c) The person to whom the contract is awarded shall execute
 a bond, approved by the board, for the faithful performance of the contract. The person shall perform the work in accordance with the plans, specifications, and working details, unless all or any of them are modified by a four-fifths vote of the members of the board. In that case, if the cost of the work is reduced by reason of the modification, the person to whom the contract is awarded shall make an allowance on the contract price to the extent of the reduction.

(d) In any county that has appointed a road commissioner pursuant to Section 2006 of the Streets and Highways Code, or in any county that has abolished the office of road commissioner and complied with Section 2006.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, the board may authorize the road commissioner, or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county
 director of transportation, to execute changes or additions to the work for any contract made pursuant to this article in an amount not to exceed:

(1) For contracts whose original cost is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) For contracts whose original cost is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract.

(3) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered
 shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract that is in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Notwithstanding subdivision (e), no change or addition shall exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000).

(e) The County of Los Angeles may elect to be subject to all of the following provisions: 

(1) For contracts whose original cost exceeds twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index. 

(2) For contracts whose
 original cost exceeds fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) If the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (d) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the decision by the county engineer or other county officer whom authority was delegated to shall be binding on the County of Los Angeles, and all existing protest and grievance procedures regarding that decision remain valid. 

(4) At the time the board delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (d) with regard to the contract costs specified
 in this subdivision, the board shall implement appropriate measures to prevent fraud and ensure accountability for that delegated authority.

(5) This subdivision does not apply if the sum of the contracts modified under this subdivision, subdivision (c) of Section 20142, subdivision (b) of Section 20395, subdivision (b) of Section 20614, and subdivision (b) of Section 20998, exceeds seven contracts.

(6) If a contract is modified under this subdivision, the County of Los Angeles shall provide a review report to the Assembly Committee on Local Government and the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance
 no later than July 1, 2026.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 5.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20405.

(a) The board shall afford all bidders an opportunity to examine the plans, specifications, and working details, and shall award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder. The board may provide by resolution that the bids be opened, examined, and declared by an officer designated in the resolution. The resolution shall require that the bids be opened at a public meeting called by the officer and that the results of the bidding be reported to the board at a subsequent regular board meeting. The notice inviting bids shall state the time and place of the public meeting and the name of the designated officer.

(b) All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover
 and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the county.

(3) A certified check made payable to the county.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the county.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the county beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(c) The person to whom the contract is awarded shall execute a
 bond, approved by the board, for the faithful performance of the contract. The person shall perform the work in accordance with the plans, specifications, and working details, unless all or any of them are modified by a four-fifths vote of the members of the board. In that case, if the cost of the work is reduced by reason of the modification, the person to whom the contract is awarded shall make an allowance on the contract price to the extent of the reduction.

(d) In any county that has appointed a road commissioner pursuant to Section 2006 of the Streets and Highways Code, or in any county that has abolished the office of road commissioner and complied with Section 2006.1 of the Streets and Highways Code, the board may authorize the road commissioner, or a registered civil engineer under the direction of the county director of transportation,
 to execute changes or additions to the work for any contract made pursuant to this article in an amount not to exceed:

(1) For contracts whose original cost is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) For contracts whose original cost is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract.

(3) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand
 dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract that is in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any change or addition exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000).

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 6.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20406.

If the board of supervisors is advised by the county surveyor or, in a county not having a county surveyor, by the officer having similar duties and authority, that the work can be done for a sum less than the lowest responsible bid, the board may reject all bids and order the work done by day labor, under the supervision and direction of the county surveyor or officer having similar duties and authority. In such case, the road commissioners in their respective districts shall employ all labor required, and direct the conduct of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20407.

In the event of great emergency, including, but not limited to, states of disaster defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, upon the majority vote of the board, the board may proceed at once to replace or repair any and all bridges without adopting plans, specifications, strain sheets, or working details and without letting contracts or calling for bids. The work may be done by day labor under the direction of the board or by contract, or by a combination of the two. If done wholly or in part by contract, the contractor shall be paid the actual cost of the use of machinery and tools and of material and labor expended by him or her in doing the work, plus not more than 15 percent to cover all profits, supervision, and any other expense. No more than the lowest current market prices shall be paid for materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 542.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20409.

The board of supervisors may authorize such road commissioner to employ such workmen and purchase such materials, equipment, tools, and appliances and cause such work to be done as is necessary to construct or maintain such bridges and to keep them in repair without adopting plans and specifications, or working details and without advertising for bids as required in Sections 20402, 20403, and 20404. The cost of such construction, maintenance or repair shall be paid out of the county road funds or out of the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 27. Legislative Bodies—Improvement Act of 1911 [20410. - 20464.]

20410.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by legislative bodies for the doing of work or the furnishing of materials, supplies and equipment, as provided for in the Improvement Act of 1911, Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20411.

Before the legislative body awards any contract for doing any work or for furnishing materials, supplies and equipment or any portion thereof, authorized by this division, the legislative body shall pass a resolution ordering the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20412.

Notice shall be posted inviting sealed proposals or bids for doing such work, or for furnishing materials, supplies and equipment or any portion thereof. Notice inviting such proposals, and referring to the specifications on file, shall be published, but if there is no newspaper published in the city, then it shall only be posted. The time fixed for the opening of the bids shall be not less than 10 days from the time of the first publication or posting of the notice.
